Maryland, session 2026, HB0105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 21–330.3 and 21–330.4 of Article – Health – General of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 21–330.4 and 21–330.5, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
13–517.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) (i) “Facility” means an agency, an association, a corporation, a firm,
a partnership, or any other entity.
(ii) “Facility” does not include a grocery store or restaurant that is
subject to [§ 21–330.3] § 21–330.4 of the Health – General Article.
Article – Health – General
21–330.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIN FOOD ALLERGEN” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN 21 U.S.C. § 321.
(B) EACH RESTAURANT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO EACH CUSTOMER A
WRITTEN DISCLOSURE OF EACH MAIN FOOD ALLERGEN, IF ANY, THAT IS AN
INGREDIENT IN EACH MENU ITEM.
(C) A RESTAURANT MAY SATISFY THE REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION BY MAKING THE DISCLOSURE IN ANY
REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE FORM, INCLUDING:
(1) ON THE MENU;
(2) IN A SEPARATE INSERT OR HANDOUT; OR

HOUSE BILL 105 3
(3) IN AN ELECTRONIC OR DIGITAL FORMAT.
21–1214.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, any person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 3 of this title or any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 3 of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to:
(i) For a first offense, a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment
not exceeding 90 days, or both; and
(ii) For a second offense, a fine not exceeding $2,500 or imprisonment
not exceeding 1 year, or both.
(2) A person who violates § 21–330.1 OR § 21–330.3 of this title is not
subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(b) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed under this section, a person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 3 of this title or any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 3 of this title or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued under Subtitle 3 of this title:
(1) Is liable for a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000, to be collected in a civil
action in the District Court for any county; and
(2) May be enjoined from continuing the violation.
(c) Each day on which a violation occurs is a separate violation under this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.